02_Morphology/ava.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<v%>                ! Verb
%<tv%>               ! Transitive
%<aor%>              ! Aorist
%<m%>                ! Masculine
%<f%>                ! Feminine
%<nt%>               ! Neuter
%<pl%>               ! Plural

%[+в%]               ! Prefix v-
%[+й%]               ! Prefix j-
%[+б%]               ! Prefix b-
%[+р%]               ! Prefix r-

%[+msc%]             ! Masculine agreement
%[+fem%]             ! Feminine agreement
%[+neu%]             ! Neuter agreement
%[+plu%]             ! Plural agreement

%>                   ! Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Prefixes ;

LEXICON Prefixes

%[+в%]:в%< Verbs ;
%[+й%]:й Verbs ;
%[+б%]:б Verbs ;
%[+р%]:р Verbs ;

LEXICON AGR

%<m%>%[%+msc%]: # ;
%<f%>%[%+fem%]: # ;
%<nt%>%[%+neu%]: # ;
%<pl%>%[%+plu%]: # ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>уна AGR ;

LEXICON Verbs

бицине:иц V-TV ; ! "говорить", "say"
